California, session 20252026, AB1625.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 102106 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:102106. Each member of the board shall receive the sum of two hundred dollars ($200) for each attendance at up to three noticed meetings of the board per month, and shall be allowed actual necessary traveling expenses incurred in the discharge of the member’s duties.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.